Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Chapter 17. Names of State Facilities

§ 820.
The naming of State buildings and facilities.

Except for State transportation buildings and facilities named by the Transportation Board in accordance with

19 V.S.A. § 5

, the name by which a State building or facility is to be known shall be authorized by the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 78, eff. June 21, 1994; amended

2015, No. 40

, § 26a, eff. March 1, 2016.

§ 821.
State facilities.

State buildings.

“Asa Bloomer State Office Building” shall be the name of the building now known as the “Hulett” office building in the city of Rutland.

“Robert H. Wood, Jr. Criminal Justice and Fire Service Training Center of Vermont” shall be the name of the buildings and grounds now known as the “Vermont Fire and Police Training Academy” in Pittsford.

“Edgar M. Weed State Fish Hatchery” shall be the name of the State Fish Hatchery on Lake Champlain in Grand Isle.

“Mac L. Stevens Memorial Hangar” shall be the name of the aircraft hangar at the Agency of Transportation District 6 headquarters at the E.F. Knapp Airport in Berlin.

“John J. Zampieri State Office Building” shall be the name of the State office building at 108 Cherry Street in Burlington.

“Emory A. Hebard State Office Building” shall be the name of the State office building at 100 Main Street in Newport.

The parking lot for the “Emory A. Hebard State Office Building,” located at the State office building at 100 Main Street in Newport, shall be named the “Warren ‘Jersey’ Drown Parking Facility.”

“McFarland State Office Building” shall be the name of the State office building at Five Perry Street in Barre.

“Vermont Psychiatric Care Hospital” shall be the name of the State Hospital in Berlin.

“Vermont State Health Laboratory” shall be the name of the State Health Laboratory in Colchester.

“Senator James M. Jeffords Welcome Center” shall be the name of the Welcome Center in Bennington.

“Northeast Kingdom International Airport” shall be the name of the Newport State Airport in Coventry.

“Vermont Agriculture and Environmental Laboratory” shall be the name of the State laboratory in Randolph.

“Francis B. McCaffrey Courthouse” shall be the name of the courthouse at 9 Merchants Row in Rutland.

State correctional facilities. The names of State correctional facilities shall be as follows:

In Newport City, “Northern State Correctional Facility.”

In St. Albans, “Northwest State Correctional Facility.”

In Springfield, “Southern State Correctional Facility.”

In Windsor, “Southeast State Correctional Facility.”

In St. Johnsbury, “Northeast Regional Correctional Facility.”

In Rutland, “Marble Valley Regional Correctional Facility.”

In South Burlington, “Chittenden Regional Correctional Facility.”

In Woodstock, “Woodstock Regional Correctional Facility.”

In St. Johnsbury, “Caledonia Community Work Camp.”

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 78, eff. June 21, 1994; amended

1995, No. 62

, §§ 40, 51, eff. April 26, 1995;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 74, eff. April 29, 1998;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 81, eff. May 24, 2000;

2001, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. June 27, 2002;

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. June 8, 2004;

2005, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. May 15, 2006;

2013, No. 51

, § 29a, eff. May 29, 2013;

2015, No. 26

, § 26, eff. May 18, 2015;

2015, No. 40

, § 24;

2015, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. June 2, 2016;

2019, No. 42

, § 23, eff. May 30, 2019.